Utah statutes.
70A-8-509.   Specification of duties of securities intermediary by other
statute or regulation -- Manner of performance of duties of securities
intermediary and exercise of rights of entitlement holder.
(1)  If the substance of a duty imposed upon a securities intermediary by
Sections 70A-8-504 through 70A-8-508 is the subject of other statute,
regulation, or rule, compliance with that statute, regulation, or rule
satisfies the duty.
(2)  To the extent that specific standards for the performance of the duties
of a securities intermediary or the exercise of the rights of an entitlement
holder are not specified by other statute, regulation, or rule or by agreement
between the securities intermediary and entitlement holder, the securities
intermediary shall perform its duties and the entitlement holder shall
exercise its rights in a commercially reasonable manner.
(3)  The obligation of a securities intermediary to perform the duties imposed
by Sections 70A-8-504 through 70A-8-508 is subject to:
(a)  rights of the securities intermediary arising out of a security interest
under a security agreement with the entitlement holder or otherwise; and
(b)  rights of the securities intermediary under other law, regulation, rule,
or agreement to withhold performance of its duties as a result of unfulfilled
obligations of the entitlement holder to the securities intermediary.
(4)  Sections 70A-8-504 through 70A-8-508 do not require a securities
intermediary to take any action that is prohibited by other statute,
regulation, or rule.
